New York, session 2025-2026, A1110.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 924-a of the real property tax law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Notwithstanding any provisions of this chapter, or any other gener- 4 al, special or local law to the contrary, in any case where an owner of 5 real property has elected to pay taxes in installments, if any such 6 installment is not paid on or before the date when due, additional 7 interest shall only begin to accrue from the due date of such missed 8 installment payment at the rate as determined pursuant to this section, 9 or such other law as may locally be applicable. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01408-01-5